District of Columbia statutes.
8-108.02b

Replacement of regulated flame retardants [Not funded].

[Not funded].

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-336, § 3b, 58 DCR 605
May 12, 2016, D.C. Law 21-108, § 2(a), 63 DCR 4315
Applicability of D.C. Law 21-108: Section 3 of D.C. Law 21-108 provided (a) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (b) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (c) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.